Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 9 Uniform Prudent Investor Act

386B.9-010.
Trustee to act as prudent investor.

All trustees acting under this chapter with respect to investments shall have the authority and duties as set forth in KRS

286.3-277

to act as a prudent investor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 78, effective July 15, 2014.